es: Tipo de propulsor del cohete de modelismo: Pólvora negra; CO2; Compuesto (APCP); Aire comprimido; Ventilador de conducto eléctrico (EDF); Banda elástica; Agua; Otro
ja: 模型ロケット用推進剤のタイプ: 黒色火薬; CO2; コンポジット (APCP); 圧縮空気; 電動ダクテッドファン (EDF); 輪ゴム; 水; その他
lt-LT: Modelinės raketos kuro tipas: Juodasis parakas; CO2; Kompozitinis (APCP); Suslėgtas oras; Elektrinis kanalinis ventiliatorius (EDF); Guminė juosta; Vanduo; Kita
el: Τύπος προωθητικού μοντέλου πυραύλου: Μαύρη πυρίτιδα; CO2; Σύνθετο (APCP); Πεπιεσμένος αέρας; Ηλεκτρικός κινητήρας με αγωγό (EDF); Λαστιχάκι; Νερό; Άλλο
de: Typ des Modellraketentreibstoffs: Schwarzpulver; CO2; Komposit (APCP); Druckluft; Impeller (EDF); Gummiband; Wasser; Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип гориво за моделна ракета: Черен барут; CO2; Композитно (APCP); Сгъстен въздух; Електрически канален вентилатор (EDF); Ластик; Вода; Друго
hu: Modellrakéta hajtóanyagának típusa: Feketelőpor; CO2; Kompozit (APCP); Sűrített levegő; Elektromos légcsatornás ventilátor (EDF); Gumiszalag; Víz; Egyéb
zh-TW: 模型火箭推進劑類型: 黑火藥; 二氧化碳; 複合推進劑 (APCP); 壓縮空氣; 電動涵道風扇 (EDF); 橡皮筋; 水; 其他
it: Tipo di propellente per razzomodellismo: Polvere nera; CO2; Composito (APCP); Aria compressa; Ventola intubata elettrica (EDF); Elastico; Acqua; Altro
ro-RO: Tip de propulsor pentru rachetă model: Pulbere neagră; CO2; Compozit (APCP); Aer comprimat; Ventilator de conductă electric (EDF); Bandă elastică; Apă; Altele
nl: Modelraket drijfgas type: Zwartkruit; CO2; Composiet (APCP); Perslucht; Electric ducted fan (EDF); Elastiek; Water; Overig
tr: Model roket yakıtı türü: Kara barut; CO2; Kompozit (APCP); Basınçlı hava; Elektrikli kanallı fan (EDF); Lastik bant; Su; Diğer
pt-PT: tipo de propelente para foguetes modelo: Pólvora negra; CO2; Compósito (APCP); Ar comprimido; Ventoinha elétrica em duto (EDF); Elástico; Água; Outro
ru: Тип топлива модели ракеты: Черный порох; CO2 (углекислый газ); Композитное топливо (APCP); Сжатый воздух; Электрический импеллер (EDF); Резиномотор; Вода; Другое
vi: Loại nhiên liệu tên lửa mô hình: Thuốc súng đen; CO2; Composite (APCP); Khí nén; Quạt dẫn động bằng điện (EDF); Dây thun; Nước; Khác
pt-BR: Foguete de modelismo tipo de propelente: Pólvora negra; CO2; Composto (APCP); Ar comprimido; Fan carenado elétrico (EDF); Elástico; Água; Outro
da: Drivmiddeltype til modelraket: Sortkrudt; CO2; Komposit (APCP); Trykluft; Elektrisk blæser med kanal (EDF); Elastik; Vand; Andet
sv: Drivmedelstyp för modellraket: Svartkrut; CO2; Komposit (APCP); Tryckluft; Elektrisk fläkt (EDF); Gummiband; Vatten; Annan
fr: Type de propergol de fusée miniature: Poudre noire; CO2; Composite (APCP); Air comprimé; Turbine électrique (EDF); Élastique; Eau; Autre
nb: Type drivstoff for modellrakett: Svartkrutt; CO2; Kompositt (APCP); Trykkluft; Elektrisk vifte (EDF); Gummistrikk; Vann; Annet
pl: Typ paliwa rakiety modelarskiej: Proch czarny; CO2; Kompozytowy (APCP); Sprężone powietrze; Elektryczny wentylator kanałowy (EDF); Gumka recepturka; Woda; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta raketnega goriva za model: Črni smodnik; CO2; Kompozit (APCP); Stisnjen zrak; Električni kanalski ventilator (EDF); Elastika; Voda; Drugo
fi: Rakettimoottorin ajoaineen tyyppi: Mustaruuti; CO2; Komposiitti (APCP); Paineilma; Sähköinen puhallinmoottori (EDF); Kuminauha; Vesi; Muu
sk-SK: Typ paliva pre modelársku raketu: Čierny prach; CO2; Kompozitný (APCP); Stlačený vzduch; Elektrické dúchadlo (EDF); Gumička; Voda; Iné
en: Model rocket propellant type: Black powder; CO2; Composite (APCP); Compressed air; Electric ducted fan (EDF); Rubber band; Water; Other
cs: Typ raketového paliva pro model: Černý prach; CO2; Kompozitní (APCP); Stlačený vzduch; Dmychadlo (EDF); Gumička; Voda; Jiné
ko: 모형 로켓 추진제 유형: 흑색 화약; CO2; 합성 수지(APCP); 압축 공기; 전기 덕트 팬(EDF); 고무 밴드; 물; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta raketnog goriva za model: Crni barut; CO2; Kompozitni (APCP); Komprimirani zrak; Električni kanalni ventilator (EDF); Elastična traka; Voda; Ostalo
zh-CN: 模型火箭推进剂类型: 黑火药; CO2; 复合推进剂（APCP）; 压缩空气; 涵道风扇（EDF）; 橡皮筋; 水; 其他
th: ประเภทเชื้อเพลิงสำหรับจรวดจำลอง: ดินปืน; CO2; คอมโพสิต (APCP); อากาศอัด; พัดลมท่อไฟฟ้า (EDF); หนังยาง; น้ำ; อื่นๆ